Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIII Private Corporations and Associations
Religious, Charitable and Educational Societies

273.010.
Not subject to general corporation law, except as to process agent. [Repealed.]

273.020.
Who may organize; articles of incorporation. [Repealed.]

273.030.
When organized; powers. [Repealed.]

273.040.
Directors to adopt rules; not to engage in banking or insurance. [Repealed.]

273.050.
Changing charter or articles of incorporation. [Repealed.]

273.060.
Rights against person injuring property. [Repealed.]

273.070.
Incorporated college may establish adjunct schools and colleges.

Any incorporated college or university in this state may establish adjunct schools and colleges in any part of the state to be operated in connection with it. In order to establish and operate any adjunct school or college the institution establishing it may solicit and receive subscriptions and donations.

History.

4756; repealed and reenact., Acts 1990, ch. 476, Pt. V, § 611, effective July 13, 1990.

273.080.
Power over adjunct school or college.

All property procured for any adjunct school or college shall be held and applied by the governing body of the institution establishing it for the purpose of establishing and maintaining the adjunct school. The governing body may procure grounds and erect buildings for its use and occupation, appoint and remove its teachers, prescribe a course of study for its students, confer degrees of graduation from it, and exercise the same general supervision and control over it that they may exercise over their own institution.

History.

4757; amended 1976 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, §
260, effective January 2, 1978; repealed and reenact., Acts 1990, ch. 476, Pt. V, § 612, effective July 13, 1990.

273.090.
Religious society may not hold more than fifty acres of land for more than one year; escheat procedure. [Repealed.]

273.100.
Religious society — Appointment of trustees.

Any religious society may, before or after the creation of the charity, by a majority vote, appoint one (1) to three (3) trustees in whom legal or equitable title to the society’s property shall be vested to the use of the society. These appointments shall be entered upon the record book of the society. It may fill vacancies in the same manner.

History.

320.

273.110.
Trustees may sue or be sued.

A majority of the trustees may sue or be sued in their own names on behalf of the religious society in any action concerning the property of the society.

History.

321.

273.120.
Disposition of property in case of division in religious society.

In case of a division in a religious society, the trustees shall permit each party to use the church and property for divine worship a part of the time, proportioned to the members of each party. The excommunication of one (1) party by the other shall not impair this right unless it is done in good faith, on the grounds of immorality.

History.

322.

273.130.
Disposition of property in case of dissolution of religious society.

If any religious society holding land dissolves, the title shall vest in the trustees of the county seminary in which the land lies for the use of that seminary, and if there is no such seminary, then in the county judge/executive, for the benefit of common schools in the county.

History.

323; 1978, ch. 384, §
448, effective June 17, 1978; repealed and reenact., Acts 1990, ch. 476, Pt. V, § 613, effective July 13, 1990.

273.140.
Sale of property held for charity for reinvestment.

Upon petition in equity stating the necessity of such action, if it will not violate any reservation or limitation in any dedication or grant, the Circuit Court of the county in which real property is held for a religious society or other charity may direct a sale of the property to reinvest the proceeds in the same county and for the same general purposes.

History.

324.

273.150.
Board of incorporated cemetery to make annual report.

On the first of January of each year the board of directors or trustees of every incorporated cemetery or burying ground organized for private profit shall make a complete written report to its stockholders and lot owners of its assets and liabilities as of that date.

History.

202, 208a: amend. Acts, 1946, ch. 141, § 4.